Massachusetts, session 194th, S59.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Pursuant to Article 97 of the Amendments to the Constitution of the 
Commonwealth of Massachusetts, and in accordance with the declaration of restriction recorded 
in the Worcester County District Registry of Deeds at plan book 863 as plan 2, land located 
within lot 9 at West Millbury Road and Eight Lots Road in the town of Sutton, shall be permitted 
for farm use as defined by section 1A of chapter 128 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 
2022 Official Edition. 
SECTION 2. Nothing in this act shall exempt said parcel from farming limitations in 
section 3 of chapter 40A of the General Laws. 
SECTION 3. Nothing in this act shall exempt said parcel from farming limitations in 
section 125A of chapter 111 of the General Laws. 

of 2 11  SECTION 4. Nothing in this act shall exempt said parcel from farming limitations in 
section 6 of chapter 243 of the General Laws. 
SECTION 5. The executive office of energy and environmental affairs, in consultation 
with the Massachusetts division of fish wildlife, shall establish guidelines to implement this act 
no later than 90 days following its passage. 
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect upon its passage.